Maryland, session 2025, SB0795.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
14–103.
(c) To the extent practicable, a State or State aided or controlled entity shall
include in a maintenance contract that has a component for housekeeping or janitorial
services, a requirement that a prime contractor procure janitorial products from Blind
Industries and Services of Maryland if the specified products are made, manufactured,
remanufactured, PACKAGED, REPACKAGED, or assembled by Blind Industries and
Services of Maryland and are available.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 1 –